apertium-ky-kk.kk.lexc
LEXICON V-PERS-COND ! P_4

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}%{K%} # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: # ;


LEXICON CLIT-MA

!! Modal/discourse particles
!%+ма%<mod_qst%>:%>% %{M%}%{A%} V-PERS-COP ; ! CHECK  ! FIXME: what's this?
%+ма%<mod_qst%>:%>% %{M%}%{A%} # ;

LEXICON CLIT-OTHER

%+меді%<mod_qst%>:% %{M%}еді # ;   ! fix
%+мекен%<mod_qst%>:% %{M%}екен # ; ! fix?
%+шы%<mod_foc%>:%>ш%{I%} # ;
%+ғой%<mod_ass%>:% %{G%}ой # ;
%+ғана%<postadv%>:% %{G%}ана # ; ! "only"
%+да%<postadv%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! "also"
# ;

LEXICON CLIT 

CLIT-OTHER ;
CLIT-MA ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-GENERAL
CLIT ;
V-PERS-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-COP-SUF 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}н CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLIT ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}з CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;  
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;  
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%> CLIT ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-EVID-SUF 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}н CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLIT ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}з CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;  
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;  
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT ; 


LEXICON GER-INFL

POSSESSION ;
CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON V-INFL-FINITE

! Finite forms
%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRES ;                         !
%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                     !
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;                    ! 
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-COP-SUF ;               ! 
%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% екен V-PERS-COP-SUF ; ! evidential general past
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{I%}пт%{I%} V-PERS-EVID-SUF ;       ! evidential recent past

LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE

V-INFL-NON-FINITE-IRREG ;
V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG ;

LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE-IRREG

! Adverbial Participles
%<prt_perf%>:%>%{I%}п # ;
%<prt_perf%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п # ;    ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<prt_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} # ;
%<prt_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;     ! no negative form

! Gerunds
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}р GER-INFL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>с GER-INFL ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}к GER-INFL ;

! Verbal Adjectives
%<vadj_fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<vadj_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%с V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<vadj_pot2%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}с V-ADJ ;


LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG

! Adverbial participles
%<prt_plan%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} # ;
%<prt_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-COND ;
%<prt_impf%>:%>%{E%} # ;
%<prt_irre%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н # ;

! Gerunds
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н GER-INFL ;
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н GER-INFL ;
%<ger%>:%>у GER-INFL ;
%<ger_abs%>:%>у%>ш%{I%}%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;

! Verbal adjectives 
%<vadj_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;
%<vadj%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;  ! both past (or perf?) and general
%<vadj_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н V-ADJ ;
%<vadj_pot%>:%>у%>ш%{I%} V-ADJ ;

!  Imperatives
! FIXME: check
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң # ;                      ! Dir/LR
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>%{L%}%{A%}р # ;

!  Optative/jussive forms

%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}н # ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}н # ;  ! FIXME: check
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;  ! FIXME: check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н # ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{E%}й%{I%}%{K%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;   ! FIXME: check
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}н # ;


LEXICON V-INFL-COMMON

! %<pfp%>:%{I%}п # ;   ! This has been replaced in V-INFL-NON-FINITE
V-INFL-FINITE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-INFL-FINITE ;
V-INFL-NON-FINITE ;

LEXICON Vinfl-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                              

LEXICON Vinfl-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON Vinfl-TD ! Temporary lexicon

%<v%>%<TD%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX

%<vaux%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF

%<vaux%>: V-PERS-COP-SUF ;

LEXICON Adjinfl

ADJ-COMMON ; 
%<adj%>: ADJ-LEVELS ; 
! %<n%>: POSSESSION ;  ! all adjectives can be used as nouns
Ninfl ;                ! all adjectives can be used as nouns

LEXICON V-ADJ

ADJ-COMMON ; 
%<pst%>: CLIT ; 
CLIT ; 

lEXICON ADJ-ORD

%<adj%>%<ord%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<ord%>%<n%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON ADJ-LEVELS

%<pst%>: CLIT ;
%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;        ! Dir/LR

LEXICON ADJ-COMMON

%<adj%>%<pst%>: CLIT ;
%<n%>: POSSESSION ;  ! all adjectives can be used as nouns

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

Advinfl ;
AdjKiInfl ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-I

%{I%} Advinfl ;
AdjKiInfl ; 

LEXICON AdjKiInfl

%<attr%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} ADJ-COMMON ;

LEXICON Advinfl

%<adv%>: CLIT ;

LEXICON CCinfl

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON Postposinfl 

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR 

%<abbr%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON Pron-12SG-CASES

%<gen%>:енің CLIT ;
%<dat%>:аған CLIT ;
%<acc%>:ені CLIT ;
%<abl%>:енен CLIT ;
%<loc%>:енде CLIT ;
%<ins%>:енімен CLIT ;
%<px%>:енікі CLIT ;
%<rloc%>:ендегі CLIT ;

LEXICON Pronpersinfl

CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON Pronpers

мен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:мен CLIT ;
мен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:м Pron-12SG-CASES ;

сен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:сен CLIT ;
сен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:с Pron-12SG-CASES ;

сен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:сендер Pronpersinfl ;

ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ол CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:о PronDem-INFL ;

біз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:біз Pronpersinfl ;

сіз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:сіз Pronpersinfl ;

сіз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:сіздер Pronpersinfl ;

ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:олар Pronpersinfl ;

LEXICON Proninterrinfl

%<prn%>%<itg%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON Pronindefinfl

%<prn%>%<ind%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON Pronreflinfl

%<prn%>%<ref%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON Pronindefinfl-POSS

%<prn%>%<ind%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PronDem-INFL

%<gen%>:ның CLIT ;
%<dat%>:ған CLIT ; ! FIXME: this isn't right for some of them (i.e., just -ға)
                   ! осыған/осыға?, соған, оған, бұған
%<acc%>:ны CLIT ;  ! 
%<abl%>:нан CLIT ; ! Dir/LR  ! FIXME: check for correct default
%<abl%>:дан CLIT ; ! 
%<loc%>:нда CLIT ; ! 
%<px%>:нікі%{n%} CASE ;    ! FIXME: check
%<rloc%>:ндагы ADJ-DAGI ;  ! 
%<TD%>:шалық CLIT ;        ! "that much"  ! FIXME: check cont lex
%<adv%>:лай CLIT-GENERAL ; ! 
%<sim%>:ндай ADJ-DAGI ;    ! 
%<qnt%>:нша CLIT ;         !
!%<reas%>%<abl%>:ндықтан # ; ! "because of"  ! FIXME: not attested with осы?

LEXICON AdvStems
аса Advinfl ; ! "very"
көп Advinfl ; ! "a lot"
өте Advinfl ; ! "very"
ең Advinfl ; ! "most"
жиі Advinfl ; ! "often"
дәл Advinfl ; ! "exactly"
тез Advinfl ; ! "quickly"
жалғыз Advinfl ; ! "alone"
тіпті Advinfl ; ! "too"
кейде Advinfl ; ! "sometimes"
яғни Advinfl ; ! "that is"
тек Advinfl ; ! "only
мүмкін Advinfl ; ! "probably"
біраз Advinfl ; ! "some, a little"   ! FIXME: also a quantifier
ерте Advinfl ; ! "early"
әсіресе Advinfl ; ! "especially"
ылғи Advinfl ; ! "always"
әбден Advinfl ; ! "extremely"
қайтадан Advinfl ; ! "once again"
әрі Advinfl ; ! "otherside"
құр Advinfl ; ! "just/only"
дұрыс Advinfl ; ! "correctly"
көбінесе Advinfl ; ! "mostly"
арнайы Advinfl ; ! "on purpose, specifically"
алғаш ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "at first > first"
бүгін ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "today > today's"
бұрын ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "earlier"
жаңа ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "a while ago > a while ago's"
бағана ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "just now > the one just now"
енді ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "contrastive now > the one now"
қазір ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "now > the one now"
әзір ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "now > the one now"
биыл ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "this year > this year's"
былтыр ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "last year > last year's"
кеше ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "yesterday > yesterday's"
таңертең ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "morning"
бері:бер ADV-WITH-KI-I ; ! "on the near side"
ақыр ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "last"  ! FIXME: check adv
кеш ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "evening/late"
жоғары:жоғар ADV-WITH-KI-I ; ! "high"
ежел ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "ancient"   ! FIXME: check adv
төмен ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "low > lower"
дейін ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "before"
кейін ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "after"
LEXICON AdjStems
жаман Adjinfl ; ! "bad"
әдеби Adjinfl ; ! "literary"
дәу Adjinfl ; ! "giant"
арық Adjinfl ; ! "thin"
өзгеше Adjinfl ; ! "special/particular"
ғылыми Adjinfl ; ! "scientific"
кішкене Adjinfl ; ! "little"
жергілікті Adjinfl ; ! "local"
айқын Adjinfl ; ! "clear (understandable)"
тәуелсіз Adjinfl ; ! "independent"
қарапайым Adjinfl ; ! "simple/poor folk"
жасыл Adjinfl ; ! "green"
биік Adjinfl ; ! "high, tall"
жаңа Adjinfl ; ! "new"
жарлы Adjinfl ; ! "poor"
зор Adjinfl ; ! "huge"
кай Adjinfl ; ! "what"
қиын Adjinfl ; ! "difficult"
оңай Adjinfl ; ! "light"
сұраным Adjinfl ; ! "beautıful"
тірі Adjinfl ; ! "live"
ыссы Adjinfl ; ! "hot"
кәрі Adjinfl ; ! "old (person)"
жылғы Adjinfl ; ! "year's"
LEXICON VerbStems 
жат:жатыр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
жүр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
отыр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
тұр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
жат Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
жүр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
отыр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
тұр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
қал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
ал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
сал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
кет Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
шық Vinfl-AUX ; !
бер Vinfl-AUX ; !
бол Vinfl-AUX ; !
біт Vinfl-AUX ; !
баста Vinfl-AUX ; !
жазда Vinfl-AUX ; !
кел Vinfl-AUX ; !
айық Vinfl-IV ; ! "heal"
айқындан Vinfl-IV ; ! "spread"  ! FIXME: passive(?)
айқышта Vinfl-TD ; ! "to lay criss-cross"
алып% кел Vinfl-TV ; ! "bring"
алып% бар Vinfl-TV ; ! "take"
алып% кет Vinfl-TV ; ! "take away"
амалда Vinfl-TD ; ! "contrive,manage,find a way out"
анда Vinfl-IV ; ! "pour out"
аралас Vinfl-IV ; ! "merge,blend"
арна Vinfl-TV ; ! "dedicate"
асық Vinfl-IV ; ! "hurry"
асқақта Vinfl-TD ; ! "to display haughtiness"
ата Vinfl-TV ; ! "call by name,mention"
ауна Vinfl-IV ; ! "to turn"
аңыр Vinfl-IV ; ! "to stop for a while"
байымда Vinfl-TD ; ! "to explain"
баста Vinfl-TV ; ! "start,begin"
бекш Vinfl-TD ; ! "to be strengthened"
бер Vinfl-TV ; ! "give"
биле Vinfl-IV ; ! "to dance"
бос Vinfl-IV ; ! "to scatter"
бытырла Vinfl-IV ; ! "to crack"
бықсы Vinfl-TD ; ! "to smoke"
бітір Vinfl-TV ; ! "finish"  ! FIXME: causitive
бүгіл Vinfl-IV ; ! "to bend"
бүріс Vinfl-IV ; ! "to shrink"
бұр Vinfl-TV ; ! "turn"    ! FIXME: check
бұрал Vinfl-IV ; ! "wind"  ! FIXME: passive?
гүлде Vinfl-TD ; ! "plant flowers"
домала Vinfl-IV ; ! "slide down"
ез Vinfl-TV ; ! "squish"
ерле Vinfl-TD ; ! "to distinguish oneself"
еңкей Vinfl-IV ; ! "bend"
жаз Vinfl-TV ; ! "write"
жамыра Vinfl-TD ; ! "to be admitted to ewes or cows for sucking (of lambs and calves)"
жаттық Vinfl-IV ; ! "to exercize"
жақ Vinfl-TV ; ! "ignite"
жер Vinfl-TD ; ! "loose the habbit"
жола Vinfl-IV ; ! "to approach"
жүгіріс Vinfl-TD ; ! "to compete in running"
кекір Vinfl-TD ; ! "burp"
кір Vinfl-IV ; ! "enter"
құр Vinfl-TV ; ! "to build"
көгілдірлен Vinfl-TD ; ! "to look blue"
монтаныс Vinfl-TD ; ! "pretend,feign,"
орла Vinfl-TD ; ! "dig"
оян Vinfl-IV ; ! "wake"
оят Vinfl-TV ; ! "awake"
салақта Vinfl-TD ; ! "to dangle"
су Vinfl-TD ; ! "to cool down"
сұра Vinfl-TV ; ! "request/ask for"
тақымда Vinfl-TD ; ! "to press"
тес Vinfl-TV ; ! "make a hole in"
тол Vinfl-IV ; ! "be full"
тірке Vinfl-TD ; ! "attach/register"
түс Vinfl-IV ; ! "fall"
төле Vinfl-TV ; ! "pay"
шақыр Vinfl-TV ; ! "invite"
шошаңдат Vinfl-TD ; ! "to make frequent short movements with something"
шық Vinfl-IV ; ! "leave"
іл Vinfl-TV ; ! "hang"
қазықта Vinfl-TD ; ! "to tie something to a stake driven into the ground"
қара Vinfl-TV ; ! "look at"
қақай Vinfl-TD ; ! "to curve back"
қу Vinfl-TV ; ! "chase"
қырсаулан Vinfl-TD ; ! "to grow lazy"
үз Vinfl-TV ; ! "cut,pluck"
үнде Vinfl-IV ; ! "make a sound"
ұрла Vinfl-TV ; ! "steal"
өжеттен Vinfl-TD ; ! "persist, be stubborn""
өл Vinfl-IV ; ! "die,sink,fall,perish"
жарияла Vinfl-TV ; ! "announce"
